Washington statutes.
RCW 29A.36.170

Top two candidates qualified for general election—Exception (as amended by 2013 c 11).

(1) For any office for which a primary was held, only the names of the top two candidates will appear on the general election ballot; the name of the candidate who received the greatest number of votes will appear first and the candidate who received the next greatest number of votes will appear second. No candidate's name may be printed on the subsequent general election ballot unless he or she receives at least one percent of the total votes cast for that office at the preceding primary, if a primary was conducted. On the ballot at the general election for an office for which no primary was held, the names of the candidates shall be listed in the order determined under RCW ((29A.36.130)) 29A.36.131.

(2) For the office of justice of the supreme court, judge of the court of appeals, judge of the superior court, judge of the district court, or state superintendent of public instruction, if a candidate in a contested primary receives a majority of all the votes cast for that office or position, only the name of that candidate may be printed for that position on the ballot at the general election.

[ 2013 c 11 s 45. Prior: 2005 c 2 s 6 (Initiative Measure No. 872, approved November 2, 2004); (2004 c 271 s 193 repealed by the legislature); 2003 c 111 s 917; prior: 1992 c 181 s 2; 1990 c 59 s 95. Formerly RCW 29.30.085.]

PDFRCW 29A.36.170

Top two candidates qualified for general election (as amended by 2013 c 143).

(((1))) For any office for which a primary was held, only the names of the top two candidates will appear on the general election ballot; the name of the candidate who received the greatest number of votes will appear first and the candidate who received the next greatest number of votes will appear second. No candidate's name may be printed on the subsequent general election ballot unless he or she receives at least one percent of the total votes cast for that office at the preceding primary, if a primary was conducted. On the ballot at the general election for an office for which no primary was held, the names of the candidates shall be listed in the order determined ((under)) pursuant to RCW ((29A.36.130)) 29A.36.131.

(((2) For the office of justice of the supreme court, judge of the court of appeals, judge of the superior court, or state superintendent of public instruction, if a candidate in a contested primary receives a majority of all the votes cast for that office or position, only the name of that candidate may be printed for that position on the ballot at the general election.))

[ 2013 c 143 s 1. Prior: 2005 c 2 s 6 (Initiative Measure No. 872, approved November 2, 2004); (2004 c 271 s 193 repealed by the legislature); 2003 c 111 s 917; prior: 1992 c 181 s 2; 1990 c 59 s 95. Formerly RCW 29.30.085.]

NOTES:

Reviser's note: RCW 29A.36.170 was amended twice during the 2013 legislative session, each without reference to the other. For rule of construction concerning sections amended more than once during the same legislative session, see RCW 1.12.025.

Short title—Intent—Contingent effective date—2005 c 2 (Initiative Measure No. 872): See notes following RCW 29A.52.112.

Effective date—1992 c 181: See note following RCW 29A.36.180.

Intent—Effective date—1990 c 59: See notes following RCW 29A.04.013.